test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k17_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    hvalur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hvalur
    hvalur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: hval
    hvalur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: hvali
    hvalur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: hvals
    hvalur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: hvalir
    hvalur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: hvalir
    hvalur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: [hvølum, hvalum]
    hvalur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: hvala
    hvalur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: hvalurin
    hvalur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: hvalin
    hvalur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: hvalinum
    hvalur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: hvalsins
    hvalur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: hvalirnir
    hvalur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: hvalirnar
    hvalur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: [hvølunum, hvalunum]
    hvalur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: hvalanna
